Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39F Local Rescue Programs — State and Local Search and Rescue Programs
39F.160.
Rescue squad taxing districts.

A rescue squad taxing district may be created by the fiscal court pursuant to KRS

65.182

or

65.188

.

The ad valorem tax that may be imposed for the maintenance and operation of the district shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) for each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of all property in the district.

Upon the creation of a district, the district so established shall be a taxing district within the meaning of Section 157 of the Constitution of Kentucky.

The district ad valorem taxes shall be collected by the sheriff in the same manner as county ad valorem taxes. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of four percent (4%) of the amount of the tax collected for the district.

The affairs of the district shall be controlled by a board of directors appointed by the county judge/executive, the mayor of an urban-county, or the chief executive of another local government with the approval of the legislative body of that jurisdiction.

If the district consists of one (1) county, three (3) directors shall be appointed;

If the district consists of two (2) counties, the county judge/executive of the county having the greater portion of the population of the district shall appoint two (2) directors and the county judge/executive of the other county shall appoint the third director;

If the district consists of more than two (2) counties, the county judge/executive of the county having the greatest portion of the population of the district shall appoint two (2) directors and the county judge/executive of the remaining counties comprising the district shall each appoint one (1) director;

The legislative body of each city that contains a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census shall appoint one (1) additional director. If there is not a city within the district that contains a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000), then the city with the greatest population based upon the most recent federal decennial census shall appoint one (1) additional director.

The board of directors shall be appointed within thirty (30) days after the establishment of the district. Each board member shall reside within the county or city for which appointed. Directors shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years each, except that initially the appointing authority shall appoint a minority of the board members for one (1) year terms. Subsequent terms shall all be for two (2) years. Any vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired term.

A majority of the membership of the board shall constitute a quorum.

A member of the board of directors may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

The board of directors shall provide rescue service to inhabitants of the district and may:

Purchase vehicles and all other necessary equipment and employ trained personnel who meet all federal and state requirements;

Adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectively and efficiently provide rescue service for the district. Rules and regulations shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

Employ persons to administer the daily operations of the rescue service;

Compensate employees of the district at a rate determined by the board;

Apply for and receive available funds from the state and federal government for the purpose of maintaining or improving the rescue service of the district; and

Acquire by bequest, gift, grant, or purchase any real or personal property necessary to provide rescue service.

A district shall be eligible for grants pursuant to KRS

39F.130

and workers’ compensation coverage pursuant to KRS

39F.170

.

Tax revenues of a rescue squad taxing district shall be used only for rescue services as described in this chapter. Tax revenues of a rescue squad taxing district shall be distributed among all rescue squads in the district in proportion to the percentage of the district’s population served by each squad.

The board of directors shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 98, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 40, § 17, effective March 21, 2013; 2014, ch. 92, § 23, effective January 1, 2015.

39F.170.
Workers’ compensation coverage — Limitations — Enrollment.

Rescue squad organizations or members of them or individuals associated with them for the purposes of receiving workers’ compensation benefits paid by the division shall be covered by those benefits when performing emergency preparedness, response, or recovery functions, with the following limitations:

Rescue squad organizations and individuals shall not be covered when performing fundraising functions, unless all proceeds of the function are to be dedicated to the administration or operation of the rescue squad organization.

Rescue squad organizations and individuals shall not be covered when involved in any law enforcement activity, including security or evidence recovery, except for traffic control at an accident scene or the recovery of evidence by diving or dragging when the assistance is requested by law enforcement authorities.

Rescue squad organizations and individuals shall not be covered when the primary purpose of the mission is the provision of emergency medical care or first aid. However, coverage shall be extended when:

A rescue squad provides emergency medical transportation when inclement weather or rough terrain prevents a regular ambulance from providing transportation. Transportation may be provided only upon request of the appropriate emergency medical services agency. The distance of travel shall be restricted to the nearest appropriate medical facility or ambulance;

Additional personnel or equipment are required to supplement existing emergency medical services which have been overtaxed at an incident which is subsequently declared as an emergency by any official authorized to make such a determination; or

A rescue squad provides first aid, or emergency medical care is rendered as a necessary function during a rescue mission, and the primary purpose of the mission was the rescue and not the provision of emergency medical care.

Rescue squad organizations or individuals shall not be covered when engaging in firefighting unless the firefighting was performed as a secondary function to protect persons involved in a rescue mission.

Rescue squad organizations or individuals shall not be covered when engaging in hazardous materials response, containment, cleanup, or other operations related to hazardous materials, when operating at the hazardous materials technician or hazardous materials specialist level of operation as defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120.

No person shall be covered unless enrolled on a workers’ compensation enrollment form and filed with the area manager of the division, except when the magnitude of an emergency, or a training exercise, is so great that a local emergency management director must solicit additional workers. At these times, the local director may develop and maintain a list of workers, to include names, Social Security account numbers, missions assigned, and dates covered and submit a copy of the list to the area manager of the division within twenty-four (24) hours of the conclusion of the emergency or the training exercise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 99, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Workers’ Compensation, KRS Ch. 342.

39F.180.
Reports of missing, lost, or overdue persons — Reports of search and rescue missions — Golden Alert D — Golden Alert — Green Alert — Administrative regulations on standard operating procedure — Immediate search for lost, missing, or overdue person permitted.

All 911 centers and dispatch centers, law enforcement agencies, law enforcement dispatchers, fire departments, rescue squads, emergency medical service agencies, and emergency management agencies shall report the information required to be reported by administrative regulation, for all reports of persons missing, lost, or overdue, if a search for the lost person has lasted for more than two (2) hours to:

The local emergency management director; and

The local search and rescue coordinator for the jurisdiction in which the person is reported missing.

Any missing person report for a missing minor, as that term is defined in KRS

2.015

, shall be immediately reported to the Department of Kentucky State Police by the person or organization to whom the missing minor is reported.

A missing person report for an impaired person as defined in KRS 39F.010(3)(a) shall immediately be reported as a Golden Alert D to the local emergency management director, local search and rescue coordinator if different from the local emergency manager, local media outlets, and the duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management by the person managing the search or by the organization conducting the search, in a manner to be established by county policy.

A missing person report for an impaired person as defined in KRS 39F.010(3)(b) shall immediately be reported as a Golden Alert to the local emergency management director, local search and rescue coordinator if different from the local emergency manager, local media outlets, and the duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management by the person managing the search or by the organization conducting the search. The provisions of this section do not apply to any licensed long-term health care provider conducting a search for a missing resident until the provider requests a search by a person or organization specified in subsection (1) of this section.

A missing person report for a veteran at risk shall immediately be reported as a Green Alert to the local emergency management director, local search and rescue coordinator if different from the local emergency management manager, local media outlets, and the duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management by the person managing the search or by the organization conducting the search. The provisions of this section do not apply to any licensed long-term health care provider conducting a search for a missing resident until the provider requests a search by a person or organization specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management shall contact the Transportation Cabinet if the local search coordinator determines that at any time during a search the use of electronic highway signs will aid in the search and is in the best interest of the missing person.

The making of this report does not relieve the person or organization from the duty to make other notifications and reports required in this section.

Any search and rescue mission which has lasted four (4) hours without the subject being located shall be immediately reported to the duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management by telephone or radio. Any agency, including but not limited to local law enforcement, the Kentucky State Police, fire departments, rescue squads, and emergency management, that initiates a search for any missing person not considered a Golden or Green Alert shall make the notifications indicated in subsection (2) of this section within four (4) hours of initiation of the search. Any search by any agency shall be reported to the Division of Emergency Management by telephone or radio within four (4) hours of initiation by the local search and rescue coordinator, the local emergency management director, or their designee.

The results of each lost, missing, or overdue person report or search mission required to be reported under subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall be reported to the division and the local director on forms provided by the division and containing the information required by administrative regulation. The report shall be filed within twenty (20) days after:

The search and rescue mission is discontinued; or

The victim has not been found and a decision is made to keep the case open or continue searching on a limited basis, whichever occurs earlier.

Each agency required to notify a local emergency management director or the division of a report of a missing person, or a search mission pursuant to this section shall develop a written standard operating procedure for handling and reporting requests to search for missing, lost, or overdue persons. This standard operating procedure shall be a public record.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to develop a written standard operating procedure for handling and reporting requests made by the duty officer of the Division of Emergency Management to initiate the use of electronic highway signs as part of a search for a missing, lost, or overdue person. This standard operating procedure shall be a public record.

The contents of reports, information to be conveyed upon notification, and other matters relating to the administration of this section and the securing of information required hereby shall be specified by the division by administrative regulations.

There is no requirement in Kentucky to delay the search for or rescue of any lost, missing, or overdue person. Any person who is reported lost, missing, or overdue, adult or child, may be searched for immediately by any emergency management, fire, law enforcement, emergency medical services, search and rescue, rescue squad, or other similar organization to which a missing or overdue person is reported. Any agency searching for a lost or missing person shall utilize existing resources, including but not limited to electronic highway signs, the Amber Alert System, law enforcement communications systems, electronic media, local, regional, and statewide media providers, and the Integrated Public Alert and Warning System, if authorized and under conditions permitted by the federal government. No public safety answering point, emergency dispatch center, or 911 center shall delay any call reporting a person lost, overdue, or missing to the organization specified in the county search and rescue annex of the county emergency management plan as responsible for searching for lost, missing, or overdue persons.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 100, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 122, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 109, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 106, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 54, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 86, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 6, provides that Sections 2 to 5 of the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known as the “Chase McMurray Act.”

(7/12/2012). Although 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 4, contains a reference to “Section 1 of this Act” (KRS

211.575

) in subsection (2)(b) of this statute, that reference has been codified as KRS

39F.010

(2012 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 2) to correct the failure to make the necessary adjustment to this internal reference when the text of Senate Bill 93/SCS 2 was added to the draft in the Senate Committee Substitute to House Bill 467. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected in codification under KRS 7.136(1)(h).

(7/15/2008). 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 4, provides that Sections 1 to 3 of this Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be know as the “Golden Alert Bill.”

39F.190.
Development of comprehensive written search and rescue plan.

Each local search and rescue coordinator shall assist local rescue squads in developing a comprehensive written search and rescue plan which shall address as a minimum:

Direction and control responsibilities or incident command system procedures;

Notification and reporting procedures and requirements;

Call-out procedures;

Resource identification;

Coordination of resources;

Mutual aid agreements;

Training requirements for search and rescue responders and managers;

Coordination of all on-scene operations with other local, state, and federal agencies; and

The provision of copies of topographical maps for search team members.

The local search and rescue plan shall be incorporated into the rescue services annex of the local emergency operations plan and submitted for review and adoption as part of the local emergency operations plan.

The local search and rescue plan shall be a public record and shall be updated not less than annually. A copy of the plan shall be filed with the division not less than ten (10) days after each update or amendment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 101, effective July 15, 1998.

39F.200.
Local search and rescue coordinator.

Each local emergency management director shall assume the duties of, or appoint with the concurrence of the fiscal court, city governing body, urban-county council, consolidated local government, or governing body of other local government, a local search and rescue coordinator who shall be responsible for the coordination of all search and rescue resources and operations during all search and rescue missions within the city or county. The position of local search and rescue coordinator may be a volunteer position. The local search and rescue coordinator, if appointed by the local emergency management director, shall serve a similar term not to exceed four (4) years, but may be reappointed for a similar term upon the expiration of a previous term. The local search and rescue coordinator may be removed for cause at any time by the local director, with the concurrence of the fiscal court, city governing body, urban-county council, or governing body of other local government. The local search and rescue coordinator shall successfully complete training in search management, search techniques, and incident command required by the division by administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 102, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 11, effective July 15, 2002.

39F.210.
Administrative regulations.

The Division of Emergency Management may promulgate administrative regulations which address minimum training requirements and standards of response for individuals, agencies, and organizations who respond to the following search and rescue missions:

Searching for missing, lost, or overdue person or persons;

Cave rescue;

Dive rescue and recovery of drowning victims;

Inland water search, rescue, and recovery;

Search dogs and handlers; testing and certification;

Urban search and rescue; and

High angle or rough terrain rescue and recovery.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 103, effective July 15, 1998.

39F.220.
Training courses to contain instruction on behavioral characteristics and proper care of lost persons with traumatic brain injury or developmental disability.

Each basic search and rescue course offered by or under the authority of the Division of Emergency Management shall contain not less than thirty (30) minutes of instruction in the behavioral characteristics of lost persons with a traumatic brain injury or developmental disability and the proper care of lost persons with a traumatic brain injury or developmental disability, including but not limited to autism.

Each search and rescue management course offered by or under the authority of the Division of Emergency Management shall contain not less than one (1) hour of instruction in the behavioral characteristics of lost persons with a traumatic brain injury or developmental disability and the proper care of lost persons with a traumatic brain injury or developmental disability, including but not limited to autism.

The Division of Emergency Management shall seek recommendations regarding the curricula for basic search and rescue training and search and rescue management training sessions from organizations with a history of, and demonstrable experience serving or advocating on behalf of, individuals with autism, intellectual and developmental disabilities, or traumatic brain injuries.

The time allotted for the subjects required by this section for each course and the content for each course shall be specified by administrative regulations promulgated by the Division of Emergency Management.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 106, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 6, provides that Sections 2 to 5 of the Act, which included the creation of this statute, shall be known as the “Chase McMurray Act.”

39F.990.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated or order issued pursuant to this chapter for which another penalty is not specified shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 104, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor, KRS

532.090

.